apertium-kor.kor.twol
Alphabet

 ㄱ ㄴ ㄷ ㄹ ㅁ ㅂ ㅅ ㅇ ㅈ ㅊ ㅋ ㅌ ㅍ ㅎ ㄲ ㄸ ㅃ ㅆ ㅉ
 ㅏ ㅑ ㅓ ㅕ ㅗ ㅛ ㅜ ㅠ ㅡ ㅣ ㅐ ㅒ ㅔ ㅖ ㅘ ㅙ ㅚ ㅝ ㅞ ㅟ ㅢ
 ㄳ ㄵ ㄶ ㄺ ㄻ ㄼ ㄽ ㄾ ㄿ ㅀ ㅄ 으

 %{ㅇ%}:ㅇ !
 %{ㅡ%}:ㅡ !
 %{ㅣ%}:ㅣ !
 %{ㅓ%}:ㅓ !
 %{ㅏ%}:ㅏ !
 %{ㅕ%}:ㅕ !
 %{ㄴ%}:ㄴ !
 %{ㄹ%}:ㄹ !
 %{ㅆ%}:ㅆ !
 %{ㅅ%}:ㅅ !

 %% %, %. %- %>:0 % %..   ! punctuation and boundaries

 %>:0 
;

Sets

Vowel = ㅏ ㅑ ㅓ ㅕ ㅗ ㅛ ㅜ ㅠ ㅡ ㅣ ㅐ ㅒ ㅔ ㅖ ㅘ ㅙ ㅚ ㅝ ㅞ ㅟ ㅢ ;

Consonant = ㄱ ㄴ ㄷ ㄹ ㅁ ㅂ ㅅ ㅇ ㅈ ㅊ ㅋ ㅌ ㅍ ㅎ ㄲ ㄸ ㅃ ㅆ ㅉ ㄳ ㄵ ㄶ ㄺ ㄻ ㄼ ㄽ ㄾ ㄿ ㅀ ㅄ  ;


Rules 

"topic vowel-consonant alteration - this is now how it should be done"
ㄴ:ㅇ <=> :Consonant %>:  _  ㅡ: ㄴ:  ;

"accusative vowel-consonant alteration"
ㄹ:ㅇ <=> :Consonant %>:  _  ㅡ: ㄹ:  ;

"comitative vowel-consonant alteration"
ㅇ:ㄱ <=> :Consonant %>:  _  ㅘ:  ;

"nomin vowel-consonant alteration 1"
ㄱ:ㅇ <=> :Consonant %>:  _  ㅏ:  ;

"nomin vowel-consonant alteration 2"
ㅏ:ㅣ <=> %>:  :ㅇ  _    ;

"ins  vowel-consonant alteration 1"
%{ㅇ%}:0  <=> :Vowel | :ㄹ %>:  _  %{ㅡ%}: ;

"ins  vowel-consonant alteration 2"
%{ㅡ%}:0  <=> :Vowel | :ㄹ %>: :0 _   ;

"declarative case ending alteration after vowel ending 1"
%{ㄴ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>:  _  %{ㅡ%}: ;


"Verbal Adjective full Adjectivication Process 1"
%{ㅇ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>:  _  %{ㅡ%}: ;

"Verbal Adjective full Adjectivication Process 2"
%{ㅡ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>: :0 _   ;

"copula skip after vowel ending 1"
%{ㅇ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>:  _  %{ㅣ%}: ;

"copula skip after vowel ending 2"
%{ㅣ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>: :0 _  ;


"imperative case ending alteration after vowel ending 1"
%{ㅇ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>:  _  %{ㅓ%}: ;

"imperative case ending alteration after vowel ending  2"
%{ㅓ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>: :0 _  ;

"vowel harmony"
%{ㅏ%}:ㅓ  <=> \:ㅏ  %>: :ㅇ _ ㅆ:  ;

" vowel ending 1"
%{ㅇ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>:  _  %{ㅏ%}: ;

"vowel ending  2"
%{ㅏ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>: :0 _  ;

"Honorific Process 1"
%{ㅅ%}:0  <=> :Vowel  	%>:  _  %{ㅡ%}: ;

"Imperative double ㄹ deletion Process 1"
ㄹ:0  <=>   ㄹ	%>:  _  ㅏ: ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
